Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 37

Industrial Building Revenue Bond Act of 1951

7-37-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Industrial Building Revenue Bond Act of 1951.”

Acts 1951, ch. 137, § 1 (Williams, § 4406.53a); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1701.

Cross-References. Lease of buildings and facilities authorized, title 12, ch. 2, part 3.

Limitation of actions on bonds, §28-3-113.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 26; 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Aid, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Financing Industrial Development in the South, 14 Vand. L. Rev. 621 (1961).

7-37-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Governing body” means bodies and boards, by whatsoever names they may be known, charged with the governing of a municipality;

“Industrial building” means any one (1) or combination of buildings, structures or facilities leased, or to be leased, to an industrial or commercial concern by the municipality and used, or to be used, as a factory, mill, shop, assembly plant, processing plant, fabricating plant, ship canal, port or port facility, dock or dock facility, harbor facility, railroad, railway terminal, railway belt line, railway switching facility or office building or buildings for the use of such concern, including the industrial building site and any warehouse building or facility incidental to such industrial building, which may include any manufacturing, processing or building equipment or machinery necessary to the operation conducted, or to be conducted, in such industrial building by an industrial concern; provided, that the industrial building need not be, nor have been acquired, pursuant to this chapter. “Industrial building” does not include any office building or buildings constituting a single project and not connected to or combined with any other building, structure or facility defined in this subdivision (2) as an “industrial building”, unless such office building or buildings are leased to an industrial or commercial concern that, at the time of the issuance of bonds under this chapter, for the purpose of acquiring or constructing such office building or buildings, does not have in the municipality an existing office employing more than five (5) persons, and it is found by the governing body that the acquisition or construction and leasing of such office building or buildings will result in the creation of new employment for a substantial number of people residing in and around the municipality; and

“Municipality” means any incorporated city or town, county or a metropolitan government in this state.

Acts 1951, ch. 137, § 2 (Williams, § 4406.53b); 1955, ch. 344, § 1; 1957, ch. 257, § 1; 1959, ch. 152, § 1; 1961, ch. 129, § 1; 1965, ch. 198, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1702; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 23.

7-37-103. Purpose of chapter.

It is determined and declared that the purpose of this chapter is to relieve conditions of unemployment, to aid in the rehabilitation of returning veterans, and to encourage the increase of industry and commerce within this state, thereby reducing the evils attendant upon unemployment.

Acts 1951, ch. 137, § 3 (Williams, § 4406.53c); 1959, ch. 152, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1703.

7-37-104. Powers of municipalities.

In addition to powers that it may now have, any municipality has the power under this chapter to:

Construct, acquire by gift or purchase, reconstruct, improve, better or extend any industrial building within or without the municipality or partially within or partially without the municipality, but in no event farther than ten (10) miles from the territorial boundaries of such municipality, and to acquire by gift, purchase or the exercise of the right of eminent domain lands or rights in land in connection with the industrial building; provided, that no county or metropolitan government has the power to construct, acquire by gift or purchase, reconstruct, improve, better or extend any industrial building outside the territorial limits of the county or metropolitan government;

Issue bonds to finance in whole or in part the cost of the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment or extension of any industrial building. The governing body of the municipality in determining such cost may include all cost and estimated cost of the issuance of such bonds, all engineering, inspection, fiscal and legal expenses, and interest that it is estimated will accrue during the construction period and for six (6) months thereafter on money borrowed or that it is estimated will be borrowed pursuant to this chapter;

Rent or lease such industrial buildings to industrial or commercial concerns in such manner that rents to be charged for the use of the industrial buildings shall be fixed and revised from time to time so as to produce income and revenues sufficient to provide for the prompt payment of interest upon all bonds issued under this chapter and create a sinking fund to pay the principal of such bonds when due;

Pledge to the punctual payment of bonds authorized under this chapter and interest on the bonds the income and revenues to be received from such industrial buildings, including improvements, betterments, or extensions to the industrial buildings thereafter constructed or acquired, sufficient to pay the bonds and interest, as the bonds, and interest shall become due and to create and maintain reasonable reserves for the payment of the bonds and interest;

Mortgage or convey in trust any industrial building or buildings as defined in this chapter in favor of the holder or holders of bonds issued under this chapter;

Sell and convey such industrial buildings, including, but not limited to, the sale and conveyance of the industrial buildings subject to a mortgage as provided in this chapter, for such price and at such time as the governing body of the municipality may determine; no sale or conveyance of such industrial buildings shall ever be made in such manner as to impair the rights or interests of the holder or holders of any bonds secured by the industrial buildings;

Issue its bonds to refund in whole or in part, bonds theretofore issued by such municipality under authority of this chapter; and

Enter upon any lands, waters or premises, through its agents, servants, or employees, for the purpose of making surveys, soundings, or examinations, when necessary in order to carry out the purpose and objects of this chapter, doing no unnecessary damage. In the event any person is damaged by reason of any such entry, the municipality shall be liable to the person to the extent of damages actually sustained.

Acts 1951, ch. 137, § 4 (Williams, § 4406.53d); 1955, ch. 344, § 2; 1959, ch. 152, § 3; 1968, ch. 581, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1704; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 24.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 39.

7-37-105. Exemption from state regulation.

It is not necessary for any municipality proceeding under this chapter to obtain any certificate of convenience or necessity, franchise, license, permit, or other authorization from any bureau, board, commission, or other lay instrumentality of the state in order to acquire, construct, purchase, reconstruct, improve, better, or extend any industrial building or for the issuance of bonds in connection with the acquisition, construction, purchase, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of any industrial building.

No later than sixty (60) days after the date of any bond sale, pursuant to the provisions of the bond sale, the chief administrative officer of the municipality shall file with the office of the commissioner of economic and community development, industrial development division, the following information:

The name of issuing municipality;

The name of lessee;

The total amount of the bond issue;

The bond interest and maturity schedule; and

The identity of the fiscal agent.

Acts 1951, ch. 137, § 13 (Williams, § 4406.53m); 1967, ch. 108, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 852, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1705; Acts 1980, ch. 536, § 1.

7-37-106. Improvements and bonds authorized.

The construction, acquisition, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of any industrial buildings may be authorized under this chapter, and bonds may be authorized to be issued under this chapter to provide funds for such purpose or purposes or for the refunding of bonds theretofore issued under this chapter, by resolution or resolutions of the governing body, which may be adopted at the same meeting at which the bonds are introduced by a majority of all the members of the governing body then in office, and shall take effect immediately upon adoption. The bonds shall bear interest at such rate or rates, payable semiannually, may be in one (1) or more series, may bear such date or dates, may mature at such time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from their respective dates, may be payable in such medium of payment at such place or places, may carry such registration privileges, may be subject to such terms of redemption, may be executed in such manner, may contain such terms, covenants, and conditions, and may be in such form, coupon or registered, as such resolution or subsequent resolutions may provide.

Acts 1951, ch. 137, § 5 (Williams, § 4406.53e); 1969, ch. 152, § 1; 1969, ch. 284, § 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1706.

7-37-107. Covenants permissible in bonds — Mortgage or deed of trust.

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds under this chapter may contain covenants as to:

The use and disposition of the rentals from the industrial building for which the bonds are to be issued, and from any other industrial buildings owned by the municipality at the time, including the creation and maintenance of reserves;

The issuance of other or additional bonds payable from the income and revenues from such industrial building;

The maintenance and repair of such industrial building;

The insurance to be carried on the industrial building and the use and disposition of insurance moneys; and

The terms and conditions upon which the holders of the bonds, or any portion of the bonds or any trustees for the bonds shall be entitled to the appointment of a receiver by the chancery court, which court shall have jurisdiction in such proceedings, and which receiver may enter and take possession of the industrial building and lease and maintain the building, prescribe rentals and collect, receive, and apply all income and revenues thereafter arising from the rentals, in the same manner and to the same extent as the municipality itself might do.

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds under this chapter may provide that the principal of and interest on any bonds issued under this chapter shall be secured by a mortgage or deed of trust covering the industrial building for which the bonds are issued and from any other industrial building owned by the municipality at the time, and may include any improvements or extensions thereafter made. Such mortgage or deed of trust may contain such covenants and agreements to properly safeguard the bonds as may be provided for in the resolution authorizing the bonds, but not inconsistent with this chapter and shall be executed in the manner as may be provided for in the resolution. The provisions of this chapter and any such resolution or resolutions and any such mortgage or deed of trust shall be a contract with the holder or holders of the bonds and shall continue in effect until the principal of and the interest on the bonds so issued shall have been fully paid, and the duties of the municipality and its governing body and officers under this chapter, and any such resolution or resolutions and any such mortgage or deed of trust shall be enforceable by any bondholder by mandamus, foreclosure of any such mortgage or deed of trust or other appropriate suit, action or proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Acts 1951, ch. 137, § 7 (Williams, § 4406.53g); 1955, ch. 344, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1707.

7-37-108. Lien on rentals.

All bonds issued under this chapter shall have a lien upon the rentals from the industrial building for which the bonds have been issued, and from any other industrial building securing the bonds pursuant to resolution, mortgage or deed of trust as provided in this chapter, and the governing body may provide in the resolution or resolutions authorizing such bonds for the issuance of additional bonds to be equally and ratably secured by a lien upon such rentals, or may provide that the lien upon such rentals for future bonds shall be subordinate.

Acts 1951, ch. 137, § 9 (Williams, § 4406.53i); 1955, ch. 344, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1708.

7-37-109. Bonds not general obligation.

No holder or holders of any bonds issued under this chapter shall ever have the right to compel any exercise of taxing power of the municipality to pay the bonds or the interest on the bonds and the bonds shall not constitute an indebtedness of the municipality or a loan of credit of the bond within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision. It shall be plainly stated on the face of each bond that it has been issued under this chapter, and that it does not constitute an indebtedness of the municipality or a loan of credit of the bond within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision.

Acts 1951, ch. 137, § 10 (Williams, § 4406.53j); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1709.

7-37-110. Election — Questions submitted — Declaration of result.

Prior to the delivery of and payment for any bonds authorized under this chapter, a three-fourths (¾) majority of the registered voters of such municipality voting at an election on the question of issuing such bonds shall approve of such bond issue; provided, that no such election shall be necessary in connection with the authorization of refunding bonds under this chapter. The governing body of the municipality shall, by resolution, direct the county election commission to hold the election and state the proposition to issue the bonds as it is to appear on the ballots. It shall not be necessary to submit to the voters any question other than the maximum amount of bonds to be issued and the purpose for the bonds, except that, if such bonds are to be secured by an industrial building, its rental or income, other than the industrial building for which the bonds are proposed to be issued, then the question of whether bonds so secured are to be issued shall be submitted to the voters. Upon receipt of the statement of the votes in the election from the county election commission, the governing body of the municipality, at or before its regular meeting, shall again canvass the returns and determine and declare the results of the election. The governing body shall enter upon its minutes the results and returns in the election, and the entry shall, after the delivery of and payment for any bonds voted upon at the election, be conclusive evidence of the result of the election, and no suit, action or other proceeding contesting the validity of such election shall be entertained in any of the courts of this state thereafter.

Acts 1951, ch. 137, § 6 (Williams, § 4406.53f); Acts 1955, ch. 344, § 3; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(25); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1710.

Cross-References. General municipal elections, §§6-53-101 —6-53-107.

7-37-111. Sale of bonds.

Bonds may be sold in such manner and upon such terms as may be deemed advisable by the governing body; provided, that bonds for refunding purposes shall not be sold at less than ninety-seven percent (97%) of par value and accrued interest.

Acts 1951, ch. 137, § 5 (Williams, § 4406.53e); 1969, ch. 152, § 2; 1969, ch. 284, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1711; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 25.

7-37-112. Interim financing — Certificates.

Pending the preparation of the definitive bonds, interim receipts or certificates in such form and with such provisions as the governing body may determine, may be issued to the purchaser or purchasers of bonds sold pursuant to this chapter. The bonds and interim receipts or certificates shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code, compiled in title 47, chapters 1–9.

Acts 1951, ch. 137, § 5 (Williams, § 4406.53e); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1712.

7-37-113. Validity of bonds.

Bonds bearing the signatures of officers in office on the date of the signing of the bonds shall be valid and binding obligations, notwithstanding that before the delivery of the bonds and payment for the bonds any or all the persons whose signatures appear on the bonds shall have ceased to be officers of the municipality issuing the bonds. The validity of the bonds shall not be dependent on nor affected by the validity or regularity of any proceedings relating to the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of the industrial building for which the bonds are issued. The resolution authorizing the bonds may provide that the bonds shall contain a recital that they are issued pursuant to this chapter, which recital shall be conclusive evidence of their validity and of the regularity of their issuance.

Acts 1951, ch. 137, § 8 (Williams, § 4406.53h); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1713.

7-37-114. Tax exemption of bonds.

All bonds and the income from the bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from all state, county, and municipal taxation, except inheritance, transfer and estate taxes, except as otherwise provided in this code.

Acts 1951, ch. 137, § 12 (Williams, § 4406.53l ); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1714; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 26.

7-37-115. Rentals sufficient to pay bonds.

The governing body of a municipality issuing bonds pursuant to this chapter shall prescribe and collect rentals for industrial buildings, and shall revise the rentals from time to time whenever necessary so that the income and revenues to be derived from such rentals will always be sufficient to pay when due all bonds and interest on the bonds for the payment of which such revenues are pledged, including reserves for the payment of the bonds and interest on the bonds.

Acts 1951, ch. 137, § 11 (Williams, § 4406.53k); 1959, ch. 152, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1715.

7-37-116. Supplemental nature of chapter.

The powers conferred by this chapter shall be in addition and supplemental to, and the limitations imposed by this chapter shall not affect the powers conferred by, any other general, special or local law. Industrial buildings may be acquired, purchased, constructed, reconstructed, improved, bettered, and extended, and bonds may be issued under this chapter for such purposes, notwithstanding that any general, special, or local law may provide for the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment and extension of a like industrial building, or the issuance of bonds for like purposes, and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitation or other provisions contained in any other general, special or local law.

Acts 1951, ch. 137, § 14 (Williams, § 4406.53n); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1716.